Louisiana, session 2026, HB481.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 43:147.1(B)(1) and (2) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
43:147.1(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§147.1. Compensation for printing; per character
* * *
B.(1) In all parishes that do not contain a city with a population of more than
one hundred thousand, the cost of publishing official proceedings and public notices
shall not exceed the rate of one and one-half three cents per character. When the
insertion contains material to be set in tabular form or is submitted prebuilt, the rate
will be computed at two dollars seventy-six cents per square inch based on six-point
type and six-point font. If the notice is set in larger type or font, the rate shall be
prorated. Regardless of the size of type the notice is set in, the rates specified in this
Paragraph are based on a printable space of one-inch-high and one-inch-wide
column. If the page width is either wider or narrower for a single column, the rate
per column shall be prorated.
(2) In all parishes that contain a city with a population of more than one
hundred thousand, the cost of publishing official proceedings and public notices shall
not exceed the rate of two three cents per character. When the insertion contains
material to be set in tabular form or is submitted prebuilt, the rate will be computed
at three dollars ninety-six cents per square inch based on six-point type and six-point
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 481 ENROLLED
font. If the notice is set in larger type or font, the rate shall be prorated. Regardless
of the size of type the notice is set in, the rates specified in this Paragraph are based
on a printable space of one-inch-high and one-inch-wide column. If the page width
is either wider or narrower for a single column, the rate per column shall be prorated.
* * *
D. Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraphs (B)(1) and (B)(2) of this
Section, the cost of publishing official proceedings and public notices shall not
exceed the lesser of the rates provided for in Paragraphs (B)(1) and (B)(2) of this
Section or the rate in effect on January 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.